Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5365.
people of the state of michigan enact: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "SFR tax and economics act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Affiliate" means an entity that, directly or indirectly, through 1 or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another entity. For purposes of this subdivision, an entity is controlled by another entity if the controlling entity holds, directly or indirectly, the majority voting or ownership interest in the controlled entity or has control over the day-to-day operations of the controlled entity by contract or law. (b) "Affordability covenant" means a covenant, condition, or restriction contained in a deed, contract, or other legal instrument that affects the transfer, sale, or any other interest in a covered SFR that does both of the following: (i) Establishes a period of not less than 15 years during which the covenant, condition, or restriction applies. (ii) During the period described in subparagraph (i), limits the price at which the covered SFR may be rented or sold to an amount that is affordable. For purposes of this subparagraph, an amount is considered affordable if it does not result in an annual rent or mortgage cost that exceeds 30% to 80% of the median family income for the area in which the covered SFR is located, as determined by MSHDA. As used in this subparagraph, "median family income" means the median income for the area as determined under section 8 of the United States housing act of 1937, 42 USC 1437f, for a family of 4. (c) "Beneficial owner" means an individual who, directly or indirectly, through 1 or more intermediaries, controls an entity. For purposes of this subdivision, both of the following provisions apply: (i) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii), an entity is controlled by an individual if the individual holds, directly or indirectly, a 25% or more voting or ownership interest in the entity or exercises substantial control over the day-to-day operations of the entity by contract or law. (ii) An individual is not considered to control an entity solely by virtue of holding, directly or indirectly, an ownership interest in the entity if all of the following requirements are met: (A) The individual is not an officer, director, or manager of the entity and does not hold any other leadership position with the entity. (B) The individual does not have the authority to direct the sale, refinancing, or day-to-day operations of the entity or its assets. (C) The individual owns less than 50% of the entity and does not own a plurality of the entity. (d) "Community land trust" means a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, and has as a primary purpose the development and preservation of affordable housing. (e) "Condominium unit" means that term as defined in section 4 of the condominium act, 1978 PA 59, MCL 559.104. (f) "Conforming loan limit" means that term as defined in 15 USC 9058d. (g) "Covered SFR" means a single-family residential dwelling with a fair market value that does not exceed the conforming loan limit for the county in which the single-family residential dwelling is located. For purposes of this subdivision, in determining fair market value, both of the following apply: (i) Unless the purchase transaction is not an arm's length transaction, the purchase price is considered to be the fair market value at the time of purchase. (ii) Unless subparagraph (i) applies, the true cash value as defined in section 27 of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27, is considered to be the fair market value. (h) "Department" means the department of treasury. (i) "Entity" means a person other than an individual, including a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, real estate investment trust, or other legal entity. (j) "Large investor" means an entity that directly or indirectly owns 50 or more covered SFRs. Sec. 5. As used in this act: (a) "Mission buyer" means any of the following: (i) A community land trust. (ii) A public housing agency. (iii) An MSHDA-approved entity. (b) "MSHDA" means the Michigan state housing development authority created in section 21 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1421. (c) "MSHDA-approved entity" means an entity certified by MSHDA under section 9. (d) "Person" means an individual or entity. (e) "Public housing agency" means an agency described in section 3(b)(6) of the United States housing act of 1937, 42 USC 1437a. (f) "Real estate investment trust" means that term as defined in section 856 of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 856. (g) "Related group" means an entity and all of its affiliates and beneficial owners. (h) "Single-family residential dwelling" or "SFR" means either of the following located in this state: (i) A residential structure that consists of not more than 2 dwelling units. (ii) A condominium unit that is intended for residential use. Sec. 7. For purposes of this act, all of the following apply: (a) A person is considered to acquire a single-family residential dwelling if the person directly or indirectly acquires a majority ownership interest in the single-family residential dwelling, regardless of the percentage of that ownership interest. (b) A person is considered to own a single-family residential dwelling if the person directly or indirectly owns a majority ownership interest in the single-family residential dwelling, regardless of the percentage of that ownership interest. (c) For purposes of determining whether an acquisition or ownership threshold under this act is met, all single-family residential dwellings acquired or owned by a related group must be aggregated. Sec. 9. (1) MSHDA shall create and administer the MSHDA-approved entity program to certify qualified entities that agree to affordability covenants as provided in this section as MSHDA-approved entities. (2) MSHDA shall develop a detailed application, approval, and compliance process for the program that is published and available on MSHDA's website. The detailed application, approval, and compliance process must include all of the following: (a) A qualified entity may apply to MSHDA for certification as an MSHDA-approved entity. (b) The application must include an attestation that the qualified entity will operate under affordability covenants with respect to covered SFRs acquired or owned by the qualified entity. (c) MSHDA must impose, and the qualified entity must agree to, reporting requirements to ensure implementation of and compliance with the affordability covenants. (d) On approval of an application, MSHDA must issue a certificate to the qualified entity that designates the qualified entity as an MSHDA-approved entity. (3) MSHDA may revoke a certificate if the MSHDA-approved entity does not implement or comply with the affordability covenants or does not comply with reporting or other requirements under the program. (4) MSHDA shall remain a list of qualified entities that are certified as MSHDA-approved entities on its website. (5) MSHDA may promulgate rules to implement this section pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Program" means the MSHDA-approved entity program created under subsection (1). (b) "Qualified entity" means an entity engaged in the business of developing, investing in, or otherwise acquiring and renting or selling covered SFRs. ARTICLE 2. STATE BULK-BUYER TRANSFER SURTAX Sec. 11. As used in this article: (a) "Acquired SFR" means the covered SFR acquired in a qualified acquisition. (b) "Acquirer" means the person that acquires a covered SFR in a qualified acquisition. (c) "Bulk-buyer transfer surtax" means the tax imposed under section 13. (d) "Qualified acquisition" means the acquisition by a person of a covered SFR if either of the following applies: (i) Within the 30-day period immediately preceding the date of acquisition, the person has already acquired, directly or indirectly, 2 or more covered SFRs. (ii) Within the 12-month period immediately preceding the date of acquisition, the person has already acquired, directly or indirectly, 10 or more covered SFRs. Sec. 13. (1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, in addition to all other taxes, a bulk-buyer transfer surtax is imposed on each qualified acquisition. (2) The bulk-buyer transfer surtax is due at 1 of the following times, whichever is sooner: (a) When the instrument effecting the conveyance of the acquired SFR is submitted for recording. (b) 15 days after the delivery of the instrument effecting the conveyance by the seller or grantor to the acquirer. For purposes of this subdivision, the date of the instrument effecting the transfer is presumed to be the date of delivery of the instrument. (3) The acquirer is solely liable for the bulk-buyer transfer surtax. (4) The acquirer shall pay the bulk-buyer transfer surtax to the treasurer of the county where the acquired SFR is located. (5) After the bulk-buyer transfer surtax is paid, if the person that paid the bulk-buyer transfer surtax believes that the bulk-buyer transfer surtax was paid improperly, the person may request a refund from the department in a form and manner determined by the department. The department shall pay the refund if it determines that the bulk-buyer transfer surtax was paid improperly. Sec. 15. (1) The bulk-buyer transfer surtax imposed under section 13 is levied at the rate of 4% of the fair market value of the acquired SFR. (2) To ensure compliance with this article, a written instrument effecting a conveyance of a single-family residential dwelling must state on its face the total fair market value of the single-family residential dwelling being transferred unless an affidavit is attached to the written instrument declaring the total fair market value of the single-family residential dwelling being transferred. Sec. 17. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 19, the payment of the bulk-buyer transfer surtax must be evidenced by the affixing of 1 or more documentary stamps to each written instrument effecting a conveyance subject to the bulk-buyer transfer surtax by the person making, executing, issuing, or delivering the written instrument. The stamp required by this subsection may also serve as the stamp required under 1966 PA 134, MCL 207.501 to 207.513, and the state real estate transfer tax act, 1993 PA 330, MCL 207.521 to 207.537. Stamps required by this subsection may be purchased only in the county in which the acquired SFR is located. (2) The individual using or affixing stamps shall do both of the following: (a) Affix the stamps so that removal requires the continued application of steam or water. (b) Write on the stamps the individual's initials and the date on which the stamps are affixed or used so that the stamps cannot be reused. (3) The state treasurer may prescribe another method of cancellation as the state treasurer considers appropriate. If the county treasurer is required to use a tax meter machine under section 7 of 1966 PA 134, MCL 207.507, the tax meter machine must be used to evidence the payment of the bulk-buyer transfer surtax. Sec. 19. (1) The state treasurer shall prescribe, and prepare for use by a county treasurer, adhesive stamps of the denominations and quantities that are necessary for the payment of the bulk-buyer transfer surtax. A county treasurer shall requisition the stamps as required. (2) The state treasurer shall prescribe conditions under which a county treasurer may utilize a tax meter machine to evidence the payment of the bulk-buyer transfer surtax. The state treasurer shall provide for the use of a tax meter machine or for the sale of the stamps in such places as the state treasurer considers necessary. (3) The state treasurer may prescribe alternate means for the county treasurer to evidence the payment of the bulk-buyer transfer surtax. The state treasurer shall provide the alternative means to the county treasurer if alternative means are used to evidence the payment of the bulk-buyer transfer surtax. Sec. 21. (1) The county treasurer shall collect the bulk-buyer transfer surtax and deposit it with the state treasurer as provided in this section. (2) Not later than the fifteenth day of each month, the county treasurer shall, on a form prescribed by the state treasurer, itemize the bulk-buyer transfer surtaxes collected during the preceding month and transmit the form and the bulk-buyer transfer surtaxes collected to the state treasurer. (3) The county treasurer may retain the interest earned on the money collected under this article while held by the county treasurer, as reimbursement for the costs incurred by the county in collecting and transmitting the bulk-buyer transfer surtax. The money retained by the county treasurer under this section must be deposited in the treasury of the county where the bulk-buyer transfer surtax is collected to the credit of the general fund. Sec. 23. The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of the bulk-buyer transfer surtax collected by county treasurers under this article in the state treasury to the credit of the state general fund. Sec. 25. (1) A written instrument effecting a qualified acquisition that is subject to the bulk-buyer transfer surtax must not be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of any county of this state unless documentary stamps as required by this article have been purchased at the time of presentation by the acquirer. The stamps must be affixed to the face of the instrument before recording unless the acquirer specifically requests that the instrument be recorded before the stamps are affixed. If requested, the stamps may be affixed to the reverse side of the written instrument. However, if it is necessary to record the reverse side of the written instrument, the stamps must be affixed after recording by the register of deeds. If the written instrument is not subject to the bulk-buyer transfer surtax, the written instrument must state on its face the reason for the exemption. A written instrument accepted for recording that does not comply with this act does not affect the validity of the recording as to notice. (2) An affidavit attached to a written instrument under section 15 must not be recorded and must be detached from the written instrument before recording. The affidavit must be used for auditing purposes only and must not be disclosed to any other person. Sec. 27. (1) A person shall not do any of the following: (a) Fraudulently cut, tear, or remove a documentary stamp from a written instrument. (b) Fraudulently affix to a written instrument effecting a qualified acquisition on which the bulk-buyer transfer surtax is imposed any of the following: (i) A documentary stamp that has been cut, torn, or removed from another written instrument. (ii) A documentary stamp of insufficient value. (iii) A forged or counterfeited stamp. (iv) An impression of a forged or counterfeited stamp, die, plate, or other article. (c) Willfully remove or alter the cancellation marks of a documentary stamp, restore a documentary stamp with the intent to use or cause the same to be used after it has already been used, knowingly buy, sell, offer for sale, or give away an altered or restored stamp to a person for use, or knowingly use an altered or restored stamp. (d) Knowingly or willfully prepare, keep, sell, offer for sale, or have in the person's possession a forged or counterfeited documentary stamp. (e) Knowingly or willfully issue a false or fraudulent affidavit described in section 15. (2) A person that violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. Sec. 29. The bulk-buyer transfer surtax imposed under this article is in addition to, and may be collected with, the taxes imposed under 1966 PA 134, MCL 207.501 to 207.513, and the state real estate transfer tax act, 1993 PA 330, MCL 207.521 to 207.537. Sec. 31. (1) The department shall administer the bulk-buyer transfer surtax pursuant to 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this article. If 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 and 205.31, and this article conflict, this article applies. (2) The department may promulgate rules to implement this article pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 33. The bulk-buyer transfer surtax does not apply to any of the following: (a) A qualified acquisition by a mission buyer. (b) A qualified acquisition that includes an affordability covenant. (c) A qualified acquisition of a covered SFR that is uninhabitable, cited for blight, or subject to a condemnation order, if the acquirer records a covenant or enters into a development agreement with the local unit of government in which the covered SFR is located to do any of the following within 36 months after the date of acquisition: (i) Rehabilitate the dwelling for sale to an owner-occupant. (ii) Redevelop the property into a commercial, mixed-use, or multifamily residential project of more than 2 dwelling units. (iii) Demolish the structure for conversion to public open space, stormwater management, or other civic use. ARTICLE 3. STATE SCALE-BASED SURTAX Sec. 41. As used in this article: (a) "Scale-based surtax" means the tax imposed under section 43. (b) "Tax year" means that term as defined in, and must be the same as the tax year used for purposes of, the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847. Sec. 43. (1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, in addition to all other taxes, a scale-based surtax is imposed on each large investor. (2) The rate of the scale-based surtax is equal to 25% of the sum of the depreciation and interest expenses claimed with respect to held SFRs on the large investor's income tax return filed under the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847, for the tax year at issue. (3) As used in this section, "held SFR" means a covered SFR that the large investor owns on the last day of the tax year. Sec. 45. The scale-based surtax does not apply to any of the following: (a) A large investor that is a mission buyer. (b) A covered SFR that is subject to an affordability covenant. (c) A covered SFR to which the large investor has made more than $30,000.00 in capital improvements per dwelling unit in the 24 months immediately preceding the last day of the tax year. (d) A covered SFR that is newly constructed and has been issued a certificate of occupancy within the preceding 24 months, if the covered SFR has not been leased to a tenant. (e) A covered SFR that is uninhabitable, cited for blight, or subject to a condemnation order, if the large investor records a covenant or enters into a development agreement with the local unit of government in which the covered SFR is located to do any of the following within 36 months after the date of acquisition: (i) Rehabilitate the dwelling for sale to an owner-occupant. (ii) Redevelop the property into a commercial, mixed-use, or multifamily residential project of more than 2 dwelling units. (iii) Demolish the structure for conversion to public open space, stormwater management, or other civic use. Sec. 47. (1) The scale-based surtax shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as the tax imposed under the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847. (2) The department shall administer the scale-based surtax pursuant to 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this article. If 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 and 205.31, and this article conflict, this article applies. (3) Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this act, the department shall prescribe and publish on its website a form to be used for calculating the amount of the scale-based surtax owed under this article. The department may prescribe any other forms necessary for the administration of this article. (4) The department may promulgate rules to implement this article pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 49. All scale-based surtaxes, penalties, and costs paid to the department under this article must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the state general fund. ARTICLE 4. SFR STATE OR LOCAL BENEFITS Sec. 51. As used in this article: (a) "Antiflip covenant" means a covenant, condition, or restriction contained in a deed, contract, or other legal instrument that affects the transfer, sale, or any other interest in a covered SFR that does both of the following: (i) Establishes a period of not less than 5 years during which the covenant, condition, or restriction applies. (ii) During the period described in subparagraph (i), prohibits the covered SFR from being sold to a corporate landlord. (b) "Bulk sale" means the sale or transfer of 10 or more covered SFRs by a person or related group within a rolling 12-month period. (c) "Corporate landlord" means a large investor, a real estate investment trust, or another institutional investor. (d) "Economic development incentive" means that term as defined in section 3 of the economic development incentive evaluation act, 2018 PA 540, MCL 18.1753. (e) "Entry-level SFR" means a covered SFR with a fair market value that does not exceed 50% of the conforming loan limit for the county in which the single-family residential dwelling is located. For purposes of this subdivision, in determining fair market value, both of the following apply: (i) Unless the purchase transaction is not an arm's length transaction, the purchase price is considered to be the fair market value at the time of purchase. (ii) Unless subparagraph (i) applies, the true cash value as defined in section 27 of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27, is considered to be the fair market value. (f) "SFR project" means a project described in subdivision (g). (g) "SFR state or local benefit" or "SFR benefit" means a state or local benefit provided for or related to a project involving 1 or more covered SFRs. (h) "State or local benefit" means a grant, loan, tax capture or abatement, or other economic assistance or benefit provided by this state or a political subdivision of this state. State or local benefit includes, but is not limited to, an economic development incentive. Sec. 53. (1) A person that receives an SFR state or local benefit after the effective date of this act must comply with all of the following requirements: (a) The person must sell not less than 30% of entry-level SFRs in an SFR project to owners that will occupy the entry-level SFR as a principal residence as that term is defined in section 7dd of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7dd. (b) The person shall not make a bulk sale of covered SFRs in an SFR project to an entity or related group. (c) The person must record an antiflip covenant for each covered SFR in an SFR project. (2) Beginning on the effective date of this act, a state department or agency or a political subdivision of this state shall not provide an SFR state or local benefit to a person unless that person, in writing, agrees to comply with subsection (1) and acknowledges that failure to comply with subsection (1) will result in the sanctions and remedies described in section 55. In addition, a political subdivision of this state shall not provide an SFR benefit to a person unless the political subdivision adopts an ordinance that requires a person that receives an SFR benefit to comply with subsection (1) and imposes the sanctions and remedies described in section 55, in accordance with section 55, for noncompliance. Sec. 55. (1) If the state department or agency or political subdivision of this state that provided the SFR state or local benefit believes that a person violated section 53, the state department or agency or political subdivision of this state that provided the SFR state or local benefit shall send a notice of noncompliance to the person and provide an opportunity for a hearing. (2) If, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing under subsection (1), the state department or agency or political subdivision of this state that provided the SFR state or local benefit determines that the person violated section 53, the state department or agency or political subdivision of this state shall send a final determination of noncompliance to the person. (3) A person that receives a final determination of noncompliance is subject to all of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the person must repay to this state or the political subdivision of this state an amount equal to 100% of the total financial value of the SFR state or local benefit. If the SFR state or local benefit is a tax credit, the person is not eligible to claim the tax credit. If the person has already claimed the tax credit, the person shall repay to this state or the local unit of government an amount equal to 100% of the total financial value of the tax credit. (b) The person and its related group are barred from applying for or receiving any SFR state or local benefit, including, but not limited to, a tax credit or economic development incentive, for a period of 10 years after the date of notice of noncompliance. (c) The person is subject to a civil fine equal to 10% of the total financial value of the SFR state or local benefit received. (4) If a person does not pay an amount due under subsection (3), the prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect that amount. (5) Money collected under this section that is attributable to an SFR benefit provided by this state must be deposited in the general fund of this state. (6) Money collected under this section that is attributable to an SFR benefit provided by a political subdivision of this state is not state money and must be deposited in the general fund of the political subdivision of this state that provided the SFR benefit. Sec. 57. This article does not alter a written agreement with or other contractual obligation of this state or a political subdivision of this state that is in effect on or before the effective date of this act. ARTICLE 5. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS Sec. 61. (1) An entity that owns, directly or indirectly, 10 or more single-family residential dwellings in this state during a tax year shall file an information return with the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, by the last day of the fourth month after the end of the entity's tax year. (2) The information return must include all of the following information: (a) The address of each single-family residential dwelling owned. (b) The identity of all beneficial owners of the entity. (c) A list of all of the entity's affiliates. (3) An entity that fails to file an information return as required under subsection (1) is liable to the department for a penalty of $5,000.00 per month until the information return is filed. (4) The department may use the information in the information return only to determine compliance with articles 2 and 3 of this act. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Information return" means the information return required to be filed under subsection (1). (b) "Tax year" means that term as defined in, and must be the same as the tax year used for purposes of, the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847. Sec. 63. The department may promulgate rules to implement this article pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05600'25) or House Bill No. 5367 (request no. H05600'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.